Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-907.08
Petition to adopt a rule or regulation; form; procedure.

Any person may petition an agency requesting the adoption of a rule or regulation. Each agency shall prescribe by rule or regulation the form of the petition and the procedure for its submission, consideration, and disposition. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the agency shall (1) deny the petition in writing, stating its reasons therefor, (2) initiate rulemaking or regulationmaking proceedings in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, or (3) if otherwise lawful, adopt a rule or regulation.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 26.